test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-susi24_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - susi: # Noun (24) susi 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     susi+N+Sg+Nom: susi
     susi+N+Sg+Gen: soe
     susi+N+Sg+Par: sutt
     susi+N+Sg+Ill: suttõ
     susi+N+Sg+Ine: [soen, soeh, soehn]
     susi+N+Sg+Ela: soest
     susi+N+Sg+All: soelõ
     susi+N+Sg+Ade: soel
     susi+N+Sg+Abl: soelt
     susi+N+Sg+Tra: soes
     susi+N+Sg+Ter: soeniq
     susi+N+Sg+Abe: soeldaq
     susi+N+Sg+Com: soegaq
     susi+N+Pl+Nom: soeq
     susi+N+Pl+Gen: [sussõ, sutõ]
     susi+N+Pl+Par: sussõ
     susi+N+Pl+Ill: [sussõhe, sussõ, sussõdõ]
     susi+N+Pl+Ine: [susõn, susõh, susõhn, sussõn, sussõh, sussõhn, sutõn, sutõh, sutõhn]
     susi+N+Pl+Ela: [susõst, sussõst, sutõst]
     susi+N+Pl+All: [susõlõ, sussõlõ, sutõlõ]
     susi+N+Pl+Ade: [susõl, sussõl, sutõl]
     susi+N+Pl+Abl: [susõlt, sussõlt, sutõlt]
     susi+N+Pl+Tra: [susõs, sussõs, sutõs]
     susi+N+Pl+Ter: [susõniq, sussõniq, sutõniq]
     susi+N+Pl+Abe: [susõldaq, sussõldaq, sutõldaq]
     susi+N+Pl+Com: [sussõgaq, sutõgaq]
